en: Coffees from Madagascar
de: Kaffee aus Madagaskar
es: Café de Madagascar
fr: Café de Madagascar
hr: Kave s madagaskara
hu: Madagaszkári kávék
it: Caffè di Madagascar
ja: マダガスカル産のコーヒー
nl: Koffie uit Madagascar
pt: Café de Madagascar

en: Capsules
de: Kapseln
fr: Dosettes
hr: Kapsule
hu: Kapszulák
it: Capsule
ja: カプセル
nl: Kapsules, Capsules
pt: Cápsulas

en: Tea capsules
de: Tee Kapseln
es: Cápsulas de té
fr: Thés en dosettes
hr: Čajne kapsule
hu: Teakapszulák
it: Capsule di tè
nl: Theecapsules
pt: Cápsulas de chá

en: Cocoa capsules
es: Cápsulas de cacao
fr: Capsules de cacao
hr: Kakao kapsule
hu: Kakaókapszulák
it: Capsule di cacao
lt: Kakavos kapsulės
nl: Cacaocapsules
pt: Cápsulas de cacau

en: Coffee capsules, Coffee pads
bg: Кафе на капсули
ca: Càpsules de cafè
de: Kaffees in Pads, Kaffeepads
es: Capsulas de cafe
fi: Kahvikapselit
fr: Cafés en dosettes, café en dosette, café en capsule, dosettes de café, dosette de café, capsules de café, café en pad, pad de café, café en dose, dose de café
he: קפסולות קפה
hr: Kapsule za kavu
hu: Kávékapszulák, Kávépárnák, Kávé kapszula
it: Capsule di caffè
ja: コーヒーカプセル
lt: Kavos kapsulės
nl: Koffiepads, Koffiepad
pt: Cápsulas de café
ru: Кофе-капсулы
zh: 咖啡胶囊

en: Senseo-compatible coffee capsules
de: Senseo-kompatible Kapseln
es: Cápsulas de café compatibles con Senseo
fi: Senseo-yhteensopivat kahvikapselit
fr: Cafés en dosettes compatible Senseo, Dosettes Senseo, Capsules Senseo
hr: Senseo-kompatibilne kapsule za kavu
hu: Senseo kompatibilis kávékapszulák
it: Capsule di caffè compatibili Senseo
lt: Senseo kapsulės
nl: Senseo-compatibele koffiecapsules, Senseo-compatibele koffiecapsule, Senseo
pt: Cápsulas de café compatíveis com Senseo

en: Nespresso-compatible coffee capsules
de: Nespresso-kompatible Kapseln
es: Cápsulas de café compatibles con Nespresso
fi: Nespresso-yhteensopivat kahvikapselit
fr: Cafés en dosettes compatible Nespresso, Dosettes Nespresso, Capsules Nespresso
he: קפסולות קפה תואמות נספרסו
hr: Nespresso kompatibilne kapsule kave
hu: Nespresso kompatibilis kávékapszulák
it: Capsule di caffè compatibili Nespresso
lt: Nespresso kapsulės
nl: Nespresso-compatibele Koffiecapsules, Nespresso
pt: Cápsulas de café compatíveis com Nespresso

en: Dolce Gusto-compatible coffee capsules
de: Dolce Gusto kompatible Kaffeekapseln
es: Cápsulas de café compatibles con Dolce Gusto
fr: Cafés en dosettes compatible Dolce Gusto
hr: Dolce gusto kompatibilne kapsule za kavu
hu: Dolce Gusto kompatibilis kávékapszulák
it: Capsule di caffè compatibili Dolce Gusto
lt: Dolce Gusto formato kavos kapsulės
nl: Dolce Gusto-compatibele Koffiecapsules
pt: Cápsulas de café compatíveis com Dolce Gusto

en: Dolce Gusto-compatible capsules
de: Dolce Gusto-kompatible Kapseln
es: Cápsulas compatibles con Dolce Gusto
fr: Dosettes Dolce Gusto, Capsules Dolce Gusto
hr: Dolce gusto kompatibilne kapsule
hu: Dolce Gusto kompatibilis kapszulák
it: Capsule compatibili con Dolce Gusto
lt: Dolce Gusto formato kapsulės
nl: Dolce Gusto-compatibele Capsules, Dolce Gusto
pt: Cápsulas compatíveis com Dolce Gusto

en: Tassimo-compatible coffee capsules, T-Disc coffee capsules
de: Tassimo-kompatible Kapseln
fr: Cafés en dosettes compatible Tassimo, Dosettes Tassimo, Capsules Tassimo, Dosettes T-Disc, Capsules T-Disc
hr: Tassimo-kompatibilne kapsule kave
hu: Tassimo kompatibilis kávékapszulák
nl: Tassimo-compatibele Koffiecapsules, Tassimo
pt: Cápsulas de café compatíveis com Tassimo

en: Decaffeinated coffees
bg: Кафе без кофеин
de: entkoffeinierte Kaffees, koffeinfreie Kaffees
es: Cafés descafeinados
fi: kofeiinittomat kahvit
fr: Cafés décaféinés, café décaféiné
hr: Kave bez kofeina
hu: Koffeinmentesített kávék, Koffeinmentes kávék
it: Caffè decaffeinato
ja: デカフェコーヒー
lt: Kava be kofeino
nl: Caffeïnevrije koffies, Caffeïnevrije koffie
ru: Кофе без кофеина, декофеинизированный кофе
zh: 无咖啡因咖啡

en: Decaffeinated coffee capsules
de: entkoffeinierte Kaffees in Pads, koffeinfreie Kaffees in Pads
es: Cápsulas de café descafeinado
fr: Cafés décaféinés en capsules
hr: Kapsule kave bez kofeina
hu: Koffeinmentesített kávékapszulák, Koffeinmentes kávékapszulák
it: Capsule di caffè decaffeinato
lt: Kavos kapsulės be kofeino
nl: Cafeïnevrije koffiepads, Caffeïnevrije koffiepad
pt: Cápsulas de café descafeinado
ru: Кофе без кофеина в капсулах
zh: 无咖啡因咖啡胶囊

en: Ground coffees
de: Filterkaffee, Gemahlene Kaffees
es: Cafés molidos
fi: jauhetut kahvit
fr: Cafés moulus, café moulu
hr: Mljevene kave
hu: Őrölt kávék, Őrölt kávé
it: Caffè macinato, Polvere di caffè
lt: Malta kava
nl: Gemalen koffies, Filterkoffies, Gemalen koffie, Filterkoffie
ru: Кофе молотый, Молотый кофе
tr: Öğütülmiş kahve
zh: 研磨咖啡

en: Concentrated coffees
nl: Koffieconcentraten

en: Coffee beans
bg: Кафе на зърна
de: Kaffeebohnen, Ungemahlene Kaffeebohnen, Kaffeekirschen
es: Granos de café
fi: kahvinpavut
fr: Grains de café, Café en grains
he: פולי קפה
hr: Zrna kave
hu: Szemes kávék, Kávébabok
it: Chicchi di caffè
ja: コーヒー豆
lt: Kavos pupelės
nl: Koffiebonen
tr: Kahve çekirdeği
zh: 咖啡豆

en: Roasted coffee beans
de: Geröstete Kaffeebohnen
es: Granos de café tostados
fr: Grains de café torréfiés
hr: Pržena zrna kave
hu: Pörkölt szemes kávék, Pörkölt kávébabok
lt: Skrudintos kavos pupelės
nl: Geroosterde koffiebonen
tr: Kavrulmuş kahve çekirdeği
zh: 烘焙咖啡豆, 烘烤咖啡豆

en: Arabica coffees
bg: Кафе Арабика
de: Arabica Kaffees
es: Cafés Arábica
fi: Arabica-kahvit
fr: Café Arabica
hr: Arapske kave
hu: Arabica kévák
it: Caffè Arabica
ja: アラビカコーヒー
lt: Arabika kavos
nl: Arabica koffies
ru: Арабика кофе
zh: 阿拉比卡咖啡

en: Arabica ground coffees
de: Arabica gemahlener Kaffee
fr: Café Arabica moulu
hr: Arabica mljevene kave
hu: Őrölt Arabica kévák
nl: Gemalen Arabica koffies
pt: Cafés arabica moídos

en: Arabica coffee beans
de: Arabica Kaffeebohnen
fr: Grains de café arabica
hr: Arabica zrna kave
hu: Szemes Arabica kévák, Arabica szemes kávék
nl: Arabica koffiebonen

en: Robusta coffees
bg: Кафе Робуста
de: Robusta Kaffees
fr: Café Robusta
hr: Robusta kave
hu: Robusta kávék
nl: Robusta koffies
pt: Cafés robusta